District of Columbia statutes.
31-4452

Date merger or consolidation completed.

The merger or consolidation shall be complete when the Mayor issues under § 31-4451(c)(3)(C) the certificate of merger or consolidation to the new or surviving company.

History

June 19, 1934, ch. 672, ch. III, § 51
as added Mar. 14, 1985, D.C. Law 5-160, § 3(c), 32 DCR 39

Cross References

Insurance, merger or consolidation of life companies, new company governed by a foreign jurisdiction, compliance with this chapter, see § 31-4446.

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 35-649.